Utah statutes.
62A-5b-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Disability" has the same meaning as defined in 42 U.S.C. 12102 of the
Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, as may be amended in the future, and
28 C.F.R. 36.104 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as may be amended in the
future.
(2)  "Restaurant":
(a)  includes any coffee shop, cafeteria, luncheonette, soda fountain, dining
room, or fast-food service where food is prepared or served for immediate
consumption; and
(b)  does not include:
(i)  any retail establishment whose primary business or function is the sale
of fuel or food items for off-premise, but not immediate, consumption; and
(ii)  except for a dinner theater, a theater that sells food items.
(3)  "Service animal" means:
(a) (i)  a guide dog;
(ii)  a signal dog; or
(iii)  any other animal individually trained to do work or perform tasks for
the benefit of a person with a disability, including:
(A)  guiding a person with impaired vision;
(B)  alerting a person with impaired hearing to intruders or sounds;
(C)  providing minimal protection or rescue work;
(D)  pulling a wheelchair; or
(E)  fetching dropped items; or
(b)  an animal in training to become an animal described in Subsection (3)(a).
